Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.140

Expenditure of funds on county, city building authorized—Conditions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every school district board of directors may expend local funds held for capital projects or improvements for improvements on any building owned by a city or county in which the district or any part thereof is located if an agreement is entered into with such city or county whereby the school district receives a beneficial use of such building commensurate to the amount of funds expended thereon by the district.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 238 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.047.]